Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Part 2. Receipts Not Normally Apportioned.

§ 64.2-1012.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.13; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1013.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.14; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1014.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.15; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1015.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.16; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.